pronouns.lexd
PATTERNS
Pronoun ([<erg>:] ([>:>] SpatialCase)?)? ([>:>] [<emph>:да])? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
PronounObl [>:>] (((ClassMarker[-pl] | [<h><pl>:б] | [<n><pl>:р]) [<gen>:]) | CaseMarker[-erg,-gen]) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<emph>:да])? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
PronounObl [>:>] SpatialCase ([>:>] [<emph>:да])? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

(([жи<PRON>:жи] [>:>] ClassMarker) | [жи<PRON><pl>:жал]) ([>:>] [<emph>:да])? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[жи<PRON>:ин] [>:>] [<obl>:] ([<m><erg>:що] | (([<f>:] | [<n>:]) [<erg>:лълъе]) | [<pl><erg>:до]) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<emph>:да])? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[жи<PRON>:ин] [>:>] (OblMarker[m] | [<obl><pl>:ду]) ([<gen>:] | ([>:>] [<gen>:б])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<emph>:да])? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[жи<PRON>:ин] [>:>] OblMarker[-m,-hpl,-npl] [>:>] CaseMarker[gen] ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<emph>:да])? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[жи<PRON>:ин] [>:>] (OblMarker[-hpl,-npl] | [<obl><pl>:ду]) [>:>] CaseMarker[dat] ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[жи<PRON>:ин] [>:>] (OblMarker[-hpl,-npl] | [<obl><pl>:ду]) [>:>] [<dat><emph>:тта] ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[жи<PRON>:ин] [>:>] (OblMarker[-hpl,-npl] | [<obl><pl>:ду]) [>:>] CaseMarker[dat] [>:>] SpatialCase [>:>] [<emph>:да] ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[жи<PRON>:ин] [>:>] (OblMarker[-hpl,-npl] | [<obl><pl>:ду]) [>:>] CaseMarker[aff] ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<emph>:да])? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[жи<PRON>:ин] [>:>] (OblMarker[-hpl,-npl] | [<obl><pl>:ду]) [>:>] SpatialCase ([>:>] [<emph>:да])? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

IntPronoun[com] [>:>] ClassMarker[-pl] ([>:>] (([<quest>:] ([:у] | [:да])) | [<indef>:дала]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[com] [>:>] ClassMarker[-pl] ([:>у] | [:>и]) ([>:>] (([<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да])) | [<indef>:дала]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[com] ClassMarker[pl] ([>:>] (([<quest>:] ([:у] | [:да])) | [<indef>:дала]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[pers] ([<erg>:] | ([>:>] CaseMarker[-erg,-gen])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] (([<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да])) | [<indef>:дала]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[pers] [>:>] ([<m>:ву] | [<f>:йиву] | [<n>:бу] | [<h><pl>:бу] | [<n><pl>:риву]) [<gen><quest>:] ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[pers] [>:>] (ClassMarker[-pl] | [<h><pl>:б] | [<n><pl>:р]) [<gen>:] ([>:>] ([<quest>:да] | [<indef>:дала]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[pers] [>:>] (ClassMarker[-pl] | [<h><pl>:б] | [<n><pl>:р]) [<gen>:] [>:>] SpatialCase ([>:>] (([<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да])) | [<indef>:дала]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[com] [>:>] (ClassMarker[pl] | (OblMarker[-m,-f,-n] [>:>] CaseMarker ([>:>] SpatialCase)?)) ([>:>] (([<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да])) | [<indef>:дала]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
(IntPronoun[n] | (IntPronoun[com] OblMarker[-m,-f,-n])) [>:>] CaseMarker ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] (([<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да])) | [<indef>:дала]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
(IntPronoun[-com,-adj,-st] | (IntPronoun[com] [>:>] OblMarker[-m,-f,-n])) [>:>] SpatialCase ([>:>] (([<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да])) | [<indef>:дала]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

(IntPronoun[adj] | IntPronoun[st]) ([>:>] [<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[adj] [>:>] (([<obl>:] ([<m>:щ] | [<f>:т] | [<n>:т]) [>:>] [<erg>:ти]) | (OblMarker[-m,-f,-n] [>:>] CaseMarker[erg])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[adj] [>:>] OblMarker[-f,-n,-npl] ([<gen>:] | ([>:>] [<gen>:б])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[adj] [>:>] OblMarker[-m,-hpl] [>:>] CaseMarker[gen] ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[adj] [>:>] OblMarker [>:>] CaseMarker[-erg,-gen] ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
IntPronoun[st] ([>:>] ([<obl><n>><erg>:т>ти] | (OblMarker[n] [>:>] CaseMarker[-erg])))? ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
((IntPronoun[adj] [>:>] OblMarker) | (IntPronoun[st] [>:>] OblMarker[n])) [>:>] SpatialCase ([>:>] [<quest>:] ([:ву] | [:в] | [:да]))? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

DemPronoun[com] [>:>] (ClassMarker | [<h><pl>:б] | [<n><pl>:р]) ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
((DemPronoun[m] [>:>] ClassMarker[m]) | (DemPronoun[f] [>:>] ClassMarker[f]) | (DemPronoun[n] [>:>] ClassMarker[n]) | (DemPronoun[pl] [>:>] (ClassMarker[pl] | [<an><pl>:б] | [<inan><pl>:р]))) ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
DemPronoun[com] [>:>] (([<obl>:] ([<m>:щ] | [<f>:т] | [<n>:т]) [>:>] [<erg>:ти]) | (OblMarker[-m,-f,-n] [>:>] CaseMarker[erg])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
DemPronoun[com] [>:>] OblMarker[-f,-n,-npl] ([<gen>:] | ([>:>] [<gen>:б])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
DemPronoun[com] [>:>] OblMarker[-m,-hpl] [>:>] CaseMarker[gen] ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
DemPronoun[com] [>:>] OblMarker [>:>] CaseMarker[-erg,-gen] ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
DemPronoun[m] [>:>] ([<m><sg>><erg>:щ>ти] | (OblMarker[m] ([<gen>:] | ([>:>] ([<gen>:б] | CaseMarker[-erg,-gen]))))) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
DemPronoun[f] [>:>] ([<f><sg>><erg>:т>ти] | (OblMarker[f] [>:>] CaseMarker[-erg])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
DemPronoun[n] [>:>] ([<n><sg>><erg>:т>ти] | (OblMarker[n] [>:>] CaseMarker[-erg])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
DemPronoun[pl] [>:>] OblMarker[hpl] ([<gen>:] | ([>:>] ([<gen>:б] | CaseMarker[-gen]))) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
DemPronoun[pl] [>:>] OblMarker[npl] [>:>] CaseMarker ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
DemPronoun[com] [>:>] OblMarker [>:>] SpatialCase ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
((DemPronoun[m] [>:>] OblMarker[m]) | (DemPronoun[f] [>:>] OblMarker[f]) | (DemPronoun[n] [>:>] OblMarker[n]) | (DemPronoun[pl] [>:>] OblMarker[pl])) [>:>] SpatialCase ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

([сануда<PRON>:сануда] | [тIорда<PRON>:тIорда]) ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[тIорда<PRON>:тIорда] [>:>] ([<obl><h><pl>:ду] | [<obl><n><pl>:ди]) [>:>] CaseMarker ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[тIорда<PRON>:тIорда] [>:>] ([<obl><h><pl>:ду] | [<obl><n><pl>:ди]) [>:>] SpatialCase ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

([<distr>>жи<PRON>><m>:жив>жи>в] | [<distr>>жи<PRON>><f>:жий>жи>й] | [<distr>>жи<PRON>><n>:жиб>жи>б]) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[<distr>>жи<PRON>><m>:жив>жи>в] [>:>] ([<obl><m>><erg>:щ>ти] | (OblMarker[m] [>:>] ([<gen>:б] | CaseMarker[-erg,-gen]))) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[<distr>>жи<PRON>><f>:жий>жи>й] [>:>] ([<obl><f>><erg>:т>ти] | (OblMarker[f] [>:>] CaseMarker[-erg])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?
[<distr>>жи<PRON>><n>:жиб>жи>б] [>:>] ([<obl><n>><erg>:т>ти] | (OblMarker[n] [>:>] CaseMarker[-erg])) ([>:>] SpatialCase)? ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?

PATTERN SpatialCase
LocMarker
LocMarker[-cont] [>:>] DirMarker
LocMarker[cont] [>:>] DirMarker[-al,-trans]

LEXICON Pronoun
ден<PRON>:ден
мин<PRON>:мин
ище<PRON>:ище
илIе<PRON>:илIе
битте<PRON>:битте

LEXICON PronounObl
ден<PRON>:ди
мин<PRON>:ду
ище<PRON>><obl>:ищ>и
илIе<PRON>><obl>:илI>и
битте<PRON>><obl>:битт>и

LEXICON IntPronoun
э<PRON>:э[com]
э<PRON><obl><m>:лълъе[pers]
э<PRON><obl><f>:лълъе[pers]
э<PRON><obl><n>:лълъун[n]
инкьассу<PRON>:инкьассу[adj]
чаму<PRON>:чаму[adj]
интто<PRON>:интто[st]

LEXICON DemPronoun
гьа<PRON>:гьа[com]
гьу<PRON>:гьу[com]
гьадо<PRON>:гьадо[m]
гьадо<PRON>:гьаде[f]
гьадо<PRON>:гьада[n]
гьадо<PRON>:гьада[pl]
гьудо<PRON>:гьудо[m]
гьудо<PRON>:гьуде[f]
гьудо<PRON>:гьуда[n]
гьудо<PRON>:гьуда[pl]
гье<PRON>:гье[com]
гьо<PRON>:гьо[com]
бокьара<PRON>:бокьара[com]
э<PRON>><which>:э>губа[com]

LEXICON ClassMarker
<m>:в[m]
<f>:й[f]
<n>:б[n]
<h><pl>:бе[pl]
<n><pl>:ре[pl]

LEXICON OblMarker
<obl><m>:щу[m]
<obl><f>:лълъи[f]
<obl><n>:лълъи[n]
<obl><h><pl>:рду[hpl]
<obl><n><pl>:рди[npl]

LEXICON LocMarker
<sup>:ла
<cont>:чIу[cont]
<in>:о
<inter>:лIи
<apud>:ха
<ad>:хъи
<place>:алда

LEXICON DirMarker
<elat>:ру
<allat>:ху[al]
<translat>:руху[trans]
<translat>:риди[trans]
<translat>:руди[trans]
<translat>:рикьи[trans]

LEXICON CaseMarker
<erg>:ди[erg]
<gen>:лIи[gen]
<dat>:лъи[dat]
<aff>:ра[aff]
